Utah statutes.
53A-6-402.    Evaluation information on current or prospective school
employees -- Notice to employee -- Exemption from liability.
(1) (a)  The office's administrator of teacher licensing may provide the
appropriate administrator of a public or private school or of an agency
outside the state which is responsible for licensing or certification of
educators with any recommendation or other information possessed by the office
which has significance in evaluating the employment or license of a current or
prospective school employee, license holder, or applicant for licensing.
(b)  Information supplied under Subsection (1)(a) may include the complete
record of a hearing or the investigative report for matters which:
(i)  the educator has had an opportunity to contest; and
(ii)  did not proceed to a hearing.
(2)  At the request of the office's administrator of teacher licensing, an
administrator of a public school or school district shall, and an
administrator of a private school may, provide any recommendation or other
information possessed by the school or school district which has significance
in evaluating the employment or licensure of a current or prospective school
employee, license holder, or applicant for licensing.
(3)  If a decision is made to deny licensure, to not hire a prospective
employee, or to take action against a current employee or educator based upon
information provided under this section, the affected individual shall receive
notice of the information and be given an opportunity to respond to the
information.
(4)  A person who, in good faith, provides a recommendation or discloses or
receives information under this section is exempt from civil and criminal
liability relating to that recommendation, receipt, or disclosure.
(5)  For purposes of this section, "employee" includes a volunteer.
